Utah statutes.
59-2-1216.   Rented homestead -- Rent constituting property taxes.
If a homestead is rented by a person from another person under circumstances
deemed by the commission to be not at arm's-length, the commission may
determine rent as at arm's-length, and the determination shall be final unless
appealed within 30 days.
